District of Columbia statutes.
5-103.01

Publication authorized.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized, from time to time, without expense to the United States, to cause to be collected into compact form all the laws and ordinances in force in the District having relation and applicable to police and health, and to publish the same in a form easily accessible to all members of the community as the Police Code of the District.

R.S., D.C., § 437
June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 107, ch. 180, § 6
Municipal ordinances and regulations, proof, see § 14-505.
Protection of life, health, and property, rules and regulations, see § 1-303.03.
This section is referenced in § 5-103.02.
1981 Ed., § 4-177.
1973 Ed., § 4-177.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.